Utah statutes.
17-53-216.   Business license fees and taxes -- Application information to
be transmitted to the county assessor.
(1)  For the purpose of this section, "business" means any enterprise carried
on for the purpose of gain or economic profit, except that the acts of
employees rendering services to employers are not included in this definition.
(2)  The legislative body of a county may by ordinance provide for the
licensing of businesses within the unincorporated areas of the county for the
purpose of regulation and revenue.
(3)  All license fees and taxes shall be uniform in respect to the class upon
which they are imposed.
(4)  The county business licensing agency shall transmit the information from
each approved business license application to the county assessor within 60
days following the approval of the application.
(5)  This section may not be construed to enhance, diminish, or otherwise
alter the taxing power of counties existing prior to the effective date of
Laws of Utah 1988, Chapter 144.
